North Carolina, session 2025, SB836.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. SEPARATION LAW REVISIONS
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 50-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 50-6. Divorce after separation of one year six months on application of either party.
(a) Marriages may be dissolved and the parties thereto divorced from the bonds of
matrimony on the application of either party, if and when the husband and wife spouses have
lived separate and apart for one year, six months, except as provided in subsections (b) and (c)
of this section, and the plaintiff or defendant in the suit for divorce has resided in the State for a
period of six months.
(b) The six-month period of separation may be waived upon agreement of both parties if
the divorce is uncontested and does not involve minor children.
(c) If a person in the marriage is a victim of domestic violence, as defined under
G.S. 50B-1, and the person's spouse by marriage is responsible for committing that act of
domestic violence, the person who is the victim of domestic violence may seek a divorce without
having to meet the six-month period of separation. In making application for divorce pursuant to
this subsection, the application shall contain each of the following:
(1) A statement by the applicant that the applicant is a victim of domestic
violence.
(2) Evidence that the applicant is a victim of domestic violence, which evidence
shall include at least two of the following:
a. Law enforcement, court, or other federal or State agency records or
files.
b. Documentation from a domestic violence program, if the applicant is
alleged to be the victim of domestic violence.
c. Documentation from a medical or other professional from whom the
applicant has sought assistance in dealing with the alleged domestic
violence.
(d) A divorce under this section shall not be barred to either party by any defense or plea
based upon any provision of G.S. 50-7, a plea of res judicata, or a plea of recrimination.
Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 50-11, or of the common law, a divorce under this section
*S836-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
shall not affect the rights of a dependent spouse with respect to alimony which have been asserted
in the action or any other pending action.
(e) Whether there has been a resumption of marital relations during the period of
separation shall be determined pursuant to G.S. 52-10.2. Isolated incidents of sexual intercourse
between the parties or cohabitation for financial reasons shall not toll the statutory period required
for divorce predicated on separation of one year.six months."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 50-8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 50-8. Contents of complaint; verification; venue and service in action by nonresident;
certain divorces validated.
In all actions for divorce the complaint shall be verified in accordance with the provisions of
Rule 11 of the Rules of Civil Procedure and G.S. 1-148. The plaintiff shall set forth in his or her
complaint that the complainant or defendant has been a resident of the State of North Carolina
for at least six months next preceding the filing of the complaint, and that the facts set forth
therein as grounds for divorce, except in actions for divorce from bed and board, have existed to
his or her knowledge for at least six months prior to the filing of the complaint: Provided,
however, that if the cause for divorce is one-year six-month separation, then it shall not be
necessary to allege in the complaint that the grounds for divorce have existed for at least six
months prior to the filing of the complaint; it being the purpose of this proviso to permit a divorce
after such separation of one year six months without awaiting an additional six months for filing
the complaint: Provided, further, that if the complainant is a nonresident of the State action shall
be brought in the county of the defendant's residence, and summons served upon the defendant
personally or service of summons accepted by the defendant personally in the manner provided
in G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4(j)(1). Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any suit or action
for divorce heretofore instituted by a nonresident of this State in which the defendant was
personally served with summons or in which the defendant personally accepted service of the
summons and the case was tried and final judgment entered in a court of this State in a county
other than the county of the defendant's residence, is hereby validated and declared to be legal
and proper, the same as if the suit or action for divorce had been brought in the county of the
defendant's residence.
…."
SECTION 1.(c) This section does not affect cases pending when this act becomes
law.

PART II. ABOLISH ALIENATION OF AFFECTION/CRIMINAL CONVERSATION
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 52-13 is repealed.
SECTION 2.(b) Chapter 52 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 52-14. Abolish causes of action for alienation of affection; criminal conversation.
The common-law causes of action for alienation of affection and criminal conversation are
abolished."
SECTION 2.(c) This section does not affect cases pending when this act becomes
law.

PART III. APPROPRIATION
SECTION 3. Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of three
million dollars ($3,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to
expand education programs related to the NC Medicaid Family Planning Program, also known
as the "Be Smart" program. These funds shall provide a State match for three million dollars
($3,000,000) in nonrecurring federal funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, and those federal funds
are appropriated to the Division of Health Benefits to be used for this same purpose.
Page 2 Senate Bill 836-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes law
and applies to actions commenced on or after that date.
Senate Bill 836-First Edition Page 3